North Carolina, session 2025, HB746.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1B of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-21.15B. Registered nurses; limited immunity.
(a) If a nurse acts at the direction of a supervising health care provider during the course
of health care treatment, then the following standards apply:
(1) The nurse does not owe a separate duty of care to the patient, independent of
the duty of care owed by the health care provider.
(2) The nurse is not engaged in a collaborative process with joint responsibility
as part of a health care team.
(3) The primary duty of a nurse is to diligently execute the orders of a physician.
(4) The collaboration of a registered nurse with other supervising health care
providers under G.S. 90-18.2 does not create an independent separate duty of
care to the patient, unless the registered nurse acts independently of or departs
from the supervision of a health care provider as required by
G.S. 90-171.20(7) and G.S. 90-18(c)(14).
(b) No recovery under a medical malpractice action shall be allowed against a nurse upon
the sole grounds that the nurse owed a separate duty of care to the patient if the nurse was acting
upon the direction of a health care provider.
*H746-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt nurses from any of the following:
(1) The duty to exhibit professional conduct which is not in accordance with the
standards of practice in accordance with G.S. 90-21.12.
(2) Acts or omissions that are so obviously negligent as to lead any reasonable
person to anticipate that substantial injury would result to the patient by the
execution of that act or omission.
(3) Acts or omissions constituting gross negligence, wanton conduct, or
intentional wrongdoing.
(d) This section shall not apply to nurses acting outside of the supervision of a health care
provider."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to acts or
omissions occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 746-First Edition